Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,127
Mandamus to compel civil action; when.

Any individual who believes that a violation of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act has occurred may, after exhausting the administrative remedies provided by the act, bring a civil action to compel the commission to fulfill its responsibilities under the act, or may bring a civil action against any person or persons to compel compliance with the act.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 127;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 60.